California statutes. Education Code
(e) Any community college district that provided health services in the 1986–87 fiscal year shall maintain health services, at the level provided during the 1986–87 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter. If the cost to maintain that level of service exceeds the limits specified in subdivision (a), the excess cost shall be borne by the district.

(f) A district that begins charging a health fee may use funds for startup costs from other district funds, and may recover all or part of those funds from health fees collected within the first five years following the commencement of charging the fee.

(g) The board of governors shall adopt regulations that generally describe the types of health services included in the health service program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

76360.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district may require students in attendance and employees of the district to pay a fee, in an amount, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) per semester and twenty-five dollars ($25) per intersession, to be established by the board, for parking services. The fee shall only be required of students and employees using parking services and shall not exceed the actual cost of providing parking services.

(2) To encourage ridesharing and carpooling, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five dollars ($35) per semester and fifteen dollars ($15) per intersession for a student who certifies, in accordance with procedures
 established by the board, that he or she regularly has two or more passengers commuting to the community college with him or her in the vehicle parked at the community college.

(3) The governing board of each community college district may increase the fee limits imposed by this subdivision by the same percentage increase as the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services published by the United States Department of Commerce. The fees may be increased annually up to the next whole dollar increment above the existing fee limit that calculation produces.

(b) (1) The governing board may require payment of a parking fee at a campus in excess of the limits set forth in subdivision (a) for the purpose of funding the construction of on-campus parking facilities if both of the following conditions exist at the campus:

(A) The full-time equivalent student (FTES) per parking space on the campus exceeds the statewide average FTES per parking space on community college campuses.

(B) The market price per square foot of land adjacent to the campus exceeds the statewide average market price per square foot of land adjacent to community college campuses.

(2) If the governing board requires payment of a parking fee in excess of the limits set forth in subdivision (a), the fee may not exceed the actual cost of constructing a parking structure.

(c) Students who receive financial assistance pursuant to any programs described in subdivision (g) of Section 76300 shall be exempt
 from parking fees imposed pursuant to this section that exceed thirty dollars ($30) per semester.

(d) The governing board of a community college district may also require the payment of a fee, to be established by the governing board, for the use of parking services by persons other than students and employees.

(e) All parking fees collected shall be deposited in the designated fund of the district in accordance with the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual, and shall be expended only for parking services or for purposes of reducing the costs to students and employees of the college of using public transportation to and from the college.

(f) Fees collected for use of parking services provided for by investment of student body funds under the authority of Section 76064 shall be deposited in a
 designated fund in accordance with the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual for repayment to the student organization.

(g) “Parking services,” as used in this section, means the purchase, construction, and operation and maintenance of parking facilities for vehicles and motor vehicles as defined by Sections 415 and 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

76361.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may require students in attendance and employees at a campus of the district to pay a fee for purposes of partially or fully recovering transportation costs incurred by the district or of reducing fares for services provided by common carriers or municipally owned transit systems to these students and employees.

(b) Fees authorized by subdivision (a) for transportation services may be required to be paid only by students and employees using the services, or, in the alternative, by any of the following groups of people:

(1) Upon the favorable vote of a majority of the students and a majority of the
 employees of a campus of the district, who voted at an election on the question of whether or not the governing board should require all students and employees at the campus to pay a fee for transportation services for a period of time to be determined by the governing board of the district, the fees may be required to be paid by all students, other than those students who are exempt from the fees pursuant to subdivision (c), and all employees of the campus of the community college district.

(2) Upon the favorable vote of a majority of the students at a campus of the district, who voted at an election on the question of whether or not the governing board should require all students to pay a fee for transportation services for a period of time to be determined by the governing board of the district, the fees may be required to be paid by all students, other than those students who are exempt from the fees pursuant to subdivision (c), at the
 campus of the community college district. However, the employees shall not be entitled to use the services.

(3) Upon the favorable vote of a majority of the students at a campus of the district taking a specified number of course credits for a specified duration, to be determined by the governing board, who voted at an election on the question of whether or not the governing board should require all students taking that prescribed number of course credits to pay a fee for transportation services for a period of time to be determined by the governing board of the district, the fees may be required to be paid by those students taking the prescribed number of course credits, except those students who are exempt from the fees pursuant to subdivision (c), at the campus of the community college district. However, the employees shall not be entitled to use the services.

(c) If a fee is
 required of students for transportation services pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), the fee required of a part-time student shall be a pro rata lesser amount than the fee charged to full-time students, depending on the number of units for which the part-time student is enrolled. Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a community college district that provides for transportation services may adopt rules and regulations to exempt low-income students from this fee, or to require low-income students to pay all or part of this fee.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law:

(1) The governing board of a community college district to which this section applies shall not enter into, or extend, a contract for transportation services provided by a common carrier or a municipally owned transit system, funded by the proceeds of a fee authorized under this section,
 unless and until a majority of the students of that district, or campus of that district, as appropriate, who vote in an election, held no more than 10 years prior to the date of the expiration of the contract proposed to be entered into or no more than 10 years prior to the date to which it is proposed that an existing contract be extended, have approved the payment of the fee for this purpose.

(2) An election held pursuant to this section shall be held in accordance with regulations adopted by the board of governors to ensure that the election is publicly noticed and that all students of that district or campus of that district, as appropriate, including full-time, part-time, evening, and weekend students, have an opportunity to
 vote in the election.

(3) If the governing board of a community college district decides to seek to terminate or alter the arrangements under which the district receives transportation services from a common carrier or municipally owned transit system, the governing board shall provide at least 12 months’ notice of that intention to the provider of transportation services.

(e) (1) The total fees to be established periodically by the governing board pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse the district for transportation costs incurred by the district in providing the transportation service. The sum of the fee authorized pursuant to this section for transportation services and the fee authorized pursuant to Section 76360 for parking services shall not exceed seventy dollars ($70) per semester or thirty-five dollars ($35) per
 intersession, or the proportionate equivalent for part-time enrollment.

(2) The governing board of each community college district may increase the fee limits imposed by this subdivision by the same percentage increase as the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services published by the United States Department of Commerce. The fees may be increased annually up to the next whole dollar increment above the existing fee limit that calculation produces.

(f) The governing board of a community college district also may require the payment of a fee, to be fixed by the governing board, for the use of transportation services by persons other than students and employees.

(g) This section does not apply to, and a fee shall not be charged for, on-campus shuttles or other transportation
 services operated on a campus or between the campus and parking facilities owned by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (AB 2445)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

76365.

The board of governors shall adopt regulations regarding the authority of community college districts to require students to provide various types of instructional materials. These regulations shall reflect the intent of the Legislature that community college districts are not required to provide all materials, textbooks, equipment, and clothing necessary for each course and program. These regulations shall specify the conditions under which districts may require students to provide those materials that are of continuing value to the student outside of the classroom setting, including, but not limited to, textbooks, tools, equipment, clothing, and those materials that are necessary for the student’s vocational training and employment. The regulations shall establish a process for monitoring district compliance with these regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 34.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

76370.

The governing board of a community college district may authorize a person to audit a community college course and may charge that person a fee pursuant to this section.

(a) If a fee for auditing is charged, it shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per unit per semester.

The governing board shall proportionately adjust the amount of the fee for term lengths based upon a quarter system or other alternative system approved pursuant to regulations of the board of governors, and shall also proportionately adjust the amount of the fee for summer sessions, intersessions, and other short-term courses. In making these adjustments, the governing board may round the per unit fee and the per term or per session fee to the nearest dollar.

(b) Students enrolled in classes to receive credit for 10 or more semester credit units shall not be charged a fee to audit three or fewer semester units per semester.

(c) No student auditing a course shall be permitted to change his or her enrollment in that course to receive credit for the course.

(d) Priority in class enrollment shall be given to students desiring to take the course for credit towards a degree or certificate.

(e) Classroom attendance of students auditing a course shall not be included in computing the apportionment due a community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

76375.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district may establish an annual building and operating fee for the purpose of financing, constructing, enlarging, remodeling, refurbishing, and operating a student body center, which fee shall be required of all students attending a community college where the student body center is to be located.

(2) The fee shall be imposed by the governing board, at its option, only after a favorable vote of two-thirds of the students voting in an election held for that purpose at a community college, in the manner prescribed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and open to all regular students enrolled in credit classes at the community college. The election shall occur on a regularly scheduled college day and at least 20 percent of the students enrolled in credit classes as of October 1 of the college year during which the election is held must cast a ballot for the election to be declared valid.

(3) The annual building and operating fee shall not exceed one dollar ($1) per credit hour, up to a maximum of ten dollars ($10) per student per fiscal year. The fee requirement shall not apply to students enrolled in the noncredit courses designated by Section 84757. The fee requirement shall not apply to a student who is a recipient of the benefits under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Program, or the General Assistance program.

(4) The fee authorized by this section shall be supplemental to all other fees charged to community college students.

(5) If fee income is used to retire obligations the district incurs when it uses a revenue bond to construct a student center, the fee shall remain in effect at least until the bond obligation is retired.

(b) Each community college district shall be responsible for the custody of the moneys collected pursuant to this section, and shall provide the necessary accounting records and controls thereof. The district shall be reimbursed from these funds in an amount to cover the cost of custodial and accounting services provided by the district in connection with these funds. These funds may be expended by the district only upon submission and approval of the appropriate claim schedule by the student government or its designee.

(c) All unexpended funds and money collected by any community college district pursuant to this section shall be available for financing, constructing, enlarging, remodeling, refurbishing, and operating a student body center, and until so used, shall, subject to the approval of the student government, be deposited or invested in trust by the appropriate district official in any one or more of the following ways:

(1) Deposits in trust accounts of a bank or banks whose accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(2) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in state chartered savings and loan associations and savings accounts of federal savings and loan associations, if the associations are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.

(3) Purchase of any of the securities authorized for investment by Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(4) Participation funds that are exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code and that are open exclusively to nonprofit colleges, universities, and independent schools.

(5) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in federal or state credit unions, if the credit unions are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the National Credit Union Administration, and if any money so invested or deposited is invested or deposited in certificates, shares, or accounts fully recovered by that insurance.

(6) Deposits with the county treasurer of the county in which the district is located.

(d) The student government of a community college with an annual building and operating fee pursuant to this section shall determine the appropriate uses of the fee income and the student body center facility itself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 15.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

76380.

(a) An adult enrolled in a noncredit course shall not be required by the governing board of the district maintaining the class to pay nonresident tuition or any fee or charge of any kind for a class in English and citizenship for foreigners, a class in an elementary subject, a class designated by the governing board as a class for which high school credit is granted when the class is taken by a person who does not hold a high school diploma, or any class offered by a community college district pursuant to Section 8531, 8532, 8533, or 8534.

(b) The full-time equivalent student of adults in classes described in subdivision (a) shall be computed as prescribed by regulations of the board of governors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

76385.

A student enrolled in a class offered by a community college district that is not eligible for state apportionments may be required by the governing board of the district maintaining the class to pay a fee for the class. The total revenues derived from the fee shall not exceed the estimated cost of all of these classes maintained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 34.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

76395.

The governing board of a community college district may impose a fee on a participating student for the additional expenses incurred when physical education courses are required to use nondistrict facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 34.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California College Promise [76396. - 76396.4.]

76396.

(a) The California College Promise is hereby established, to be administered by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(b) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the chancellor shall distribute funding to community college districts to fund colleges that satisfy the requirements of this article.

(2) (A) The chancellor shall establish a funding formula that advances the goals outlined in Section 76396.1.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that sufficient funding be allocated to each community college to waive all student fees pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 76396.3.

(C) The funding formula established pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall, for funding appropriated for this article in excess of the funding determined pursuant to subparagraph (B), include, but not be limited to, both of the following factors:

(i) Number of full-time equivalent students at a community college.

(ii) Number of students at a community college who satisfy the requirements to receive federal Pell Grants and the requirements in Section 68130.5.

(c) For purposes of this article, “chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   (AB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

76396.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the California College Promise support the California Community Colleges in accomplishing all of the following goals:

(a) Increasing the number and percentage of high school students who are prepared for and attend college directly from high school and increasing the percentage of high school graduates who are placed directly into transfer-level mathematics and English courses at a community college.

(b) Increasing the percentage of students who earn associate degrees or career technical education certificates that prepare them for in-demand jobs and increasing the percentage of students who report being employed in their field of study.

(c) Increasing the percentage of students who successfully transfer from a community college to the California State University or the University of California and increasing the percentage of students who graduate from college with a baccalaureate degree.

(d) Reducing and eliminating regional achievement gaps and achievement gaps for students from groups that are underrepresented at the California Community Colleges, including, but not limited to, underrepresented students, low-income students, students who are current or former foster youth, students with disabilities, formerly incarcerated students, undocumented students, students meeting the requirements of Assembly Bill 540 of the 2001–2002 Regular Session of the Legislature, and students who are veterans.

(e) Addressing the ongoing crisis of basic needs insecurity among community college students, including, but not limited to, high levels of food and housing insecurity.

(f) Encouraging students with some prior college experience but who never completed a degree or certificate to return to college and complete their educations.

(g) Ensuring broad awareness of the benefits of the California College Promise program by informing prospective students that they may attend community college tuition-free and providing information about the on-campus services and support programs available to help students succeed in college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 24.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

76396.2.

As a condition of participating in, and receiving funding for, the California College Promise, community colleges and community college districts shall advance the goals outlined in Section 76396.1. These
 conditions shall include all of the following:

(a) Partnering with one or more local educational agencies to establish an Early Commitment to College Program that is consistent with the intent of former Article 6.3 (commencing with Section 54710) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2 to provide K–12 students and families assistance that includes, but is not limited to, learning about college opportunities, visiting campuses, taking and completing college preparatory courses, and applying for college and financial aid.

(b) Partnering with one or more local educational agencies to support and improve high school student preparation for college and reduce postsecondary remediation through practices that may include, but shall not be limited to, small learning communities, concurrent enrollment, and other evidence-based practices.

(c) Using evidence-based assessment and placement practices at the community college that comply with Section 78213 and include multiple measures of student performance, which shall include, among other measures, overall grade point averages, including grades in high school courses, and using evidence-based practices to improve outcomes for underprepared students.

(d) Participating in the California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program established pursuant to Part 54.81 (commencing with Section 88920) in order to clarify the academic path for students, help students enter a pathway, help students stay on an academic path, and ensure that students are learning.

(e) Maximizing student access to need-based financial aid by leveraging the Board of Governors fee waiver established under Section 76300, commonly known as the California Promise Grant, ensuring that students complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, Cal Grant application, or Dream Act application, and participating in a federal loan program authorized under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.). On or before January 1, 2018, a community college that does not participate in the federal loan program shall be provisionally eligible to participate in the California College Promise for one calendar year. The community college shall comply with the federal loan participation requirements in order to participate in the California College Promise on or after January 1, 2019.

(f) Maximizing available resources to address student basic needs, through the provision of basic needs services and resources, as defined in Section 66023.5. This condition may be met, at a minimum, by establishing a formal program to partner with county human services agencies, including with the staff liaison to institutions of higher education designated pursuant to Section 10006 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. This partnership may occur through the Basic Needs Center established pursuant to Section 66023.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 25.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

76396.3.

(a) A community college that has been certified by the chancellor as meeting the conditions established under Section 76396.2 shall receive funding pursuant to Section 76396.

(b) (1) The community college may use funding appropriated pursuant to this article to waive some or all of the fees for first-time community college students and returning community college students who are enrolled at the college full time, and who complete and submit either a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or a California Dream Act application, except that a student who has previously earned a degree or certificate from a postsecondary educational institution is not eligible for this fee waiver. A fee waiver that a first-time community college student or
 returning community college student receives pursuant to this subdivision shall only be for two academic years, and fees shall only be waived for the summer term and each semester or quarter of an academic year in which the student maintains full-time status. A fee waiver provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be available to a student who is charged a tuition fee pursuant to Section 76140.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a student who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States and is called to duty compelling the student to take a leave of absence pursuant to provisions of Title 10, Title 14, or Title 32 of the United States Code, or to state-funded active duty on order of the Governor, may withdraw from participation in the California College Promise and resume participation in the program upon the student’s return from duty without losing eligibility for the fee waiver or any other benefit of the program. The time
 during which the student was obliged to withdraw because of active duty shall not count toward the limit of the period of that student’s eligibility for participation in the California College Promise.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a high school pupil who enrolls in community college pursuant to Section 48800, 52620, or 76004 shall be considered a first-time community college student for purposes of paragraph (1) upon the student’s enrollment in community college after high school graduation.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Academic year” means the total of the summer term that immediately precedes the first semester or quarter of the fall term, and
 the two consecutive semesters or three quarters that immediately follow that summer term. Each semester or quarter is approximately the same length.

(2) “Armed Forces of the United States” means the United States Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Space Force, and Navy, and the reserve components of each of those forces, and the California National Guard, the California State Guard, and the California Naval Militia.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), “full time” means 12 or more semester units or the equivalent.

(B) A student enrolled in fewer than 12 units may be deemed “full time” at the discretion of the institution if the student has been certified as “full time” by a staff person in the disabled student services program at the institution who is qualified to make such
 a designation.

(4) “Returning community college student” means a student who has taken a break of one or more semesters, or the equivalent quarters.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding provided to support the California College Promise be used by the community college to advance the goals outlined in Section 76396.1.

(e) On or before July 1, 2024, the chancellor’s office shall submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code evaluating the use of funding for the California College Promise to waive student fees. The report shall determine whether the goals outlined in Section 76396.1 are being met.

(f) The chancellor’s office may require community colleges and community college districts receiving
 funding pursuant to this article to report on an annual basis the use of these funds consistent with the conditions of Section 76396.2. Funding during the following academic year may only be distributed to those community colleges and community college districts that provided this information, if required by the chancellor’s office, in a timely manner during the prior academic year and demonstrated compliance with the requirements of Section 76396.2 and this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 102, Sec. 1.   (AB 1342)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

76396.4.

The board of governors may adopt regulations implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   (AB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Student Health Services and Supervision [76401. - 76407.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [76401. - 76407.]

76401.

The governing board of any community college district shall make such rules for the examination of the students in the community colleges under its jurisdiction as will ensure proper care of the students and proper secrecy in connection with any defect noted by the supervisor of health, or his or her assistant, and may tend to the correction of the physical defect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

76403.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of any community college district shall cooperate with the local health officer in measures necessary for the prevention and control of communicable diseases in students.

(b) A registered nurse, acting under the direction of a supervising physician and surgeon, may perform immunization techniques within the course of a school immunization program provided that the administration of an immunizing agent is upon the standing orders of a supervising physician and surgeon and in accordance with written regulations which the State Department of Health Services may adopt pursuant to Section 303.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) While nothing in this section shall be construed to require the physical presence of the supervising physician and surgeon, the supervising physician and surgeon under whose direction the registered nurse is acting shall require the nurse to:

(1) Satisfactorily demonstrate competence in the administration of immunizing agents, including knowledge of all indications and contraindications for the administration of these agents, and in the recognition and treatment of any emergency reactions to agents which constitute a danger to the health or life of the person receiving the immunizations; and

(2) Possess medications and equipment required, in the medical judgment of the supervising physician and surgeon, to treat any emergency conditions and reactions caused by the immunizing agents and which constitute a danger to the health or life of the person receiving the immunization, and to demonstrate the ability to administer the medications and to utilize the equipment as necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 447.5.)
-------------------------------------------

76407.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of any law, no community college district, officer of any community college district, college president or superintendent, physician, or hospital treating any minor enrolled in any school in any district shall be held liable for the reasonable treatment of a minor without the consent of a parent or guardian of the child when the minor is ill or injured during regular schools hours, requires reasonable medical treatment, and the parent or guardian cannot be reached, unless the parent or guardian has previously filed with the district a written objection to any medical treatment other than first aid.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of any law, no physician and surgeon who in good faith and without compensation renders voluntary emergency medical assistance to a participant in a community college athletic event or contest at the site thereof, or during transportation to a health care facility, for an injury suffered in the course of the event or contest, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by the physician and surgeon in rendering the emergency medical care. The immunity granted by this paragraph shall not apply in the event of an act or omission constituting gross negligence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 449.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 48. COMMUNITY COLLEGES, EDUCATION PROGRAMS [78015. - 79520.]



  CHAPTER 1. Education Programs [78015. - 78093.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [78015. - 78016.]

78015.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district, prior to establishing a vocational or occupational training program, shall conduct a job market study of the labor market area, as those terms are defined in Section 52301.5, in which it proposes to establish the program. The study shall use the State-Local Cooperative Labor Market Information Program established in Section 10533 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or if this program is not available in the labor market area, other available sources of labor market information. The study shall include a California Occupational Information System supply analysis of existing vocational and occupational education or training programs for adults maintained by high schools, community colleges, and private postsecondary schools in the area to ensure that the anticipated employment demand for students in the proposed programs justifies the establishment of the proposed courses of instruction.

(2) The governing board of the community college district shall make copies of each job market study available to the public.

(b) Subsequent to completing the study required by this section and prior to establishing the program, the governing board of the community college district shall determine whether or not the study justifies the proposed vocational education program.

(c) If the governing board of the community college district determines that the job market study justifies the initiation of the proposed program, it shall determine, by resolution, whether the program shall be offered through the district’s own facilities or through a contract with an approved private postsecondary school pursuant to Section 8092.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

78016.

(a) Every vocational or occupational training program offered by a community college district shall be reviewed every two years by the governing board of the district to ensure that each program, as demonstrated by the California Occupational Information System, including the State-Local Cooperative Labor Market Information Program established in Section 10533 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or if this program is not available in the labor market area, other available sources of labor market information, does all of the following:

(1) Meets a documented labor market demand.

(2) Does not represent unnecessary duplication of other manpower training programs in the area.

(3) Is of demonstrated effectiveness as measured by the employment and completion success of its students.

(b) Any program that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) and the standards promulgated by the governing board shall be terminated within one year.

(c) The review process required by this section shall include the review and comments by the local Private Industry Council established pursuant to Division 8 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code, which review and comments shall occur prior to any decision by the appropriate governing body.

(d) This section shall apply to each program commenced subsequent to July 28, 1983.

(e) A written summary of the findings of each review shall be made available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Agricultural Education Program Quality Criteria [78017. - 78017.3.]

78017.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Agriculture is one of the most important industries in California, contributing over sixty-five billion dollars ($65,000,000,000) annually to the state’s economic activity.

(b) Agricultural education programs within the California Community Colleges system can, and do, play an important role in providing relevant workforce training as well as college and university transfer options for students.

(c) Among the purposes of the California Community Colleges Agriculture and Natural Resources Advisory Committee is the development of recommendations for improving and enhancing community college agricultural education programs on a statewide basis.

(d) It is in the best interests of the public that programs in agricultural education that exist within the California Community Colleges system be measured annually against uniform, objective quality criteria indicators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

78017.3.

(a) The California Community Colleges Agriculture and Natural Resources Advisory Committee shall identify and develop quality program criteria that may be used to uniformly evaluate the effectiveness of the agricultural education programs in community colleges throughout California. These criteria shall be developed in consultation with instructors, administrators, students, industry representatives, and other interested parties, and shall build upon the local program evaluation document previously developed by the advisory committee. These criteria shall be submitted, no later than June 30, 2007, in a written report to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Legislature.
